Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2629.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 2 HF 2629 (4) 91 as/js/md H.F. 2629 Section 1. Section 716.7, subsection 1, Code 2026, is 1 amended by adding the following new paragraphs: 2 NEW PARAGRAPH . 0a. âImmediate family memberâ means a 3 personâs spouse, children, parents or guardians, siblings, and 4 grandparents, whether related by blood, adoption, or marriage. 5 NEW PARAGRAPH . 00a. âLawful authorityâ means the ability 6 of a person to produce a deed or mortgage statement in the 7 personâs name, a lease agreement that includes the name and 8 signature of the property owner or an authorized representative 9 of the property owner, a valid written or electronic agreement 10 or communication authorizing the person to enter upon the 11 property, or a receipt or other reliable evidence of a 12 rent payment made to the property owner or an authorized 13 representative of the property owner dated within the last 14 sixty days. 15 NEW PARAGRAPH . g. âSquattingâ means a person knowingly 16 taking up residence at a property not open to the public 17 without lawful authority. 18 Sec. 2. Section 716.7, subsection 2, paragraph a, Code 2026, 19 is amended by adding the following new subparagraph: 20 NEW SUBPARAGRAPH . (2A) Squatting, if all of the following 21 are true: 22 (a) The person is not a current tenant at the property. 23 (b) The person does not have a valid agreement to occupy 24 the property. 25 (c) The person is not an immediate family member of the 26 owner of the property. 27 (d) The person acts without lawful authority in entering and 28 residing on the property. 29 Sec. 3. Section 716.8, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 30 following new subsection: 31 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. a. A person committing a trespass 32 as provided in section 716.7, subsection 2, paragraph âaâ , 33 subparagraph (2A), commits the following: 34 (1) For a first offense, a serious misdemeanor. 35 -1- HF 2629 (4) 91 as/js/md 1/ 2 H.F. 2629 (2) For a second offense, an aggravated misdemeanor. 1 (3) For a third or subsequent offense, a class âDâ felony. 2 b. A person providing a false document in response to a 3 request to produce a document proving lawful authority is, in 4 addition to any other criminal offense, guilty of a fraudulent 5 practice under section 714.8. 6 -2- HF 2629 (4) 91 as/js/md 2/ 2